Maryland, session 2025, HB1421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1421*

HOUSE BILL 1421
Article – Education
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
(f) “Department” means the State Department of Education.
(l) “State Board” means the State Board of Education.
5–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Accountability and Implementation Board.
5–402.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2020, and continuing until June 30, 2032, there is an
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(b) (1) The Board is [an independent] A unit of State government SUBJECT
TO THE BYLAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS OF THE STATE BOARD.
(2) THE STATE BOARD IS THE HEAD OF THE BOARD.
[(f) The Board may:
(1) Adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this subtitle;
(2) Adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business;
(3) Maintain offices at a place the Board designates in the State;
(4) Accept loans, grants, or assistance of any kind from any entity of
federal, State, or local government, an institution of higher education, or a private source;
(5) Enter into contracts or other legal instruments, including, as necessary,
contracts with independent experts to fulfill any of its duties under this subtitle;
(6) Sue or be sued; and
(7) Subpoena data needed to complete its functions and duties under this
subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1421 3
(g) (1) Except as provided in this subsection, the Board is exempt from:
(i) Title 10 and Division II of the State Finance and Procurement
Article; and
(ii) The provisions of Division I of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article that govern the State Personnel Management System.
(2) The Board is subject to the Public Information Act.
(3) (i) The Board is subject to the Open Meetings Act.
(ii) 1. Each open Board meeting shall be made available to the
public through live video streaming.
2. The Board shall make publicly available on the Internet a
complete, unedited archived video recording of each open meeting for a minimum of 5 years
after the date of the meeting.
(4) The Board and its officers and employees are subject to the Maryland
Public Ethics Law.
(5) The Board and its employees are subject to Title 12, Subtitle 4 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.]
[(h)] (F) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Board [is not intended to] MAY NOT usurp or abrogate:
(i) The operational authority of the Department, THE STATE
BOARD, the Governor’s Workforce Development Board, the Maryland Higher Education
Commission, the Department of Commerce, or the Maryland Department of Labor; or
(ii) The day–to–day decision making of county boards, local
superintendents, institutions of higher education, or other stakeholders with a role to play
in the implementation of the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future.
(2) The Board may not usurp or abrogate the lawful collective bargaining
process due educators and others in the State.
(3) (i) The Board shall have [plenary] authority, AS PROVIDED IN
THIS SUBTITLE, over [all matters within its jurisdiction under this subtitle, including]
THE MONITORING AND EVALUATION OF the intended outcomes of the Blueprint for
Maryland’s Future THROUGH APPROVAL OF IMPLEMENTATION PLANS AND OTHER
REQUIRED REPORTS MEASURING PROGRESS TOWARD ACHIEVING THE
BENCHMARKS SET IN THE BOARD’S COMPREHENSIVE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN.

HOUSE BILL 1421
(ii) In the event of a conflict between a decision or policy of the Board
and the decision or policy of another entity REQUIRED TO IMPLEMENT AN ELEMENT OF
THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE AND TO SUBMIT AN IMPLEMENTATION
PLAN UNDER § 5–404 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR A REPORT UNDER § 5–408 OF THIS
SUBTITLE on a matter [within the Board’s jurisdiction] RELATED TO AN
IMPLEMENTATION PLAN OR REPORT, the Board’s decision or policy shall control.
5–405.
(a) Subject to the [judgment] RECOMMENDATION of the Board AND APPROVAL
OF THE STATE BOARD and in accordance with this section, each fiscal year a portion of
the increase in the State share of major education aid, as defined in § 5–201 of this title,
over the amount provided in the prior fiscal year shall be withheld from public schools and
local school systems.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, beginning in fiscal year 2023,
25% of the increase in the State share of major education aid over the amount provided in
the prior fiscal year shall be automatically withheld from a local school system for the next
fiscal year.
(c) (1) For fiscal year 2023, the Board shall release funds withheld under this
section if the Board finds that a local school system has met the minimum guidelines for
the submission of the initial implementation plan under § 5–404 of this subtitle.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and ending in fiscal year 2025, the Board
shall release funds withheld under this section each year if the Board finds that a local
school system or public school:
(i) Has developed an initial implementation plan under § 5–404 of
this subtitle; and
(ii) Has received approval for its initial implementation plan and for
any subsequent modifications.
(d) Beginning in fiscal year 2026, the STATE Board shall consider releasing funds
withheld under this section to a public school or local school system if:
(1) The STATE Board receives a recommendation to release funds from:
(i) The [Department] BOARD;
(ii) The Career and Technical Education Committee established
under § 21–209 of this article; or
(iii) An Expert Review Team established under § 5–411 of this
subtitle; or

HOUSE BILL 1421 5
(2) The STATE Board, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE BOARD, determines
that a public school or local school system has made sufficient progress on an
implementation plan or taken appropriate steps to improve student performance.
(e) The STATE Board may withhold more than 25% of the increase in the State
share of major education aid over the amount provided in the current fiscal year from a
public school or local school system[, if, in the judgment of the Board] IF THE BOARD
MAKES ANY OF THE FOLLOWING DETERMINATIONS:
(1) A local school system has not made satisfactory efforts to develop or
revise the implementation plan required to be approved by the Board under § 5–404 of this
subtitle;
(2) A public school or local school system has not made sufficient progress
on its implementation plan; or
(3) A public school or local school system has not taken appropriate steps
to improve student performance.
(f) In determining whether to release or withhold additional funds under this
section, the STATE Board shall consider whether a public school or local school system has
been responsive to the recommendations of the Department, the Career and Technical
Education Committee, an Expert Review Team, THE BOARD, and the Board’s staff.
(g) The STATE Board shall notify the Governor, the President of the Senate, and
the Speaker of the House of Delegates of a decision not to release funds or to withhold
additional funds.
(h) (1) If the STATE Board, ON RECOMMENDATION OF THE BOARD, finds
that funding should not be released under subsection (c) or subsection (d) of this section,
the STATE Board shall, on or before December 1, issue an initial warning to the public
school principal or county superintendent that funds may not be released in the next fiscal
year.
(2) A warning issued under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall inform
the local principal or county superintendent of:
(i) The findings by the STATE Board and the reasoning for the
findings; and
(ii) Any steps that may be undertaken to remedy the finding.
(3) On or before February 1, the STATE Board shall make a final
determination on whether to release funds under this section for the next fiscal year.

HOUSE BILL 1421
(4) If a public school or local school system makes progress in some areas
but not in others, the STATE Board may determine that a portion of the funds may be
released while a portion may be withheld.
(i) The STATE Board shall notify the State Superintendent and the Comptroller
for purposes of § 5–205 of this title by June 1 of each year of the Board’s final decision to
release, not release, or withhold additional funds under this section in the next fiscal year.
(j) (1) The STATE Board may determine it is necessary to release or withhold
funds for the current fiscal year.
(2) The STATE Board shall notify the State Superintendent and the
Comptroller as soon as practicable for purposes of § 5–205 of this title if it decides to release
or withhold additional funds during the current fiscal year.
(k) The STATE Board shall develop an appeals process through which a public
school or local school system may contest the withholding of funds under this section.
5–406.
(a) The Board shall review the use of funds provided under Subtitle 2 of this title
by the State and local government agencies responsible for implementing the Blueprint for
Maryland’s Future.
(b) (1) On or before January 1 each year in 2022 through 2032, the
Department shall submit to the Board information on the use of school–level expenditures
in the current fiscal year to aid the Board in fulfilling its responsibilities under this subtitle.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each local school
system shall report to the Department, in a manner determined by the Department, on
school–level spending to aid the Department in fulfilling its obligations under this subtitle.
(ii) Each local school system that includes public charter schools
shall account in the report required under this subsection for the distribution of
school–level funding to public charter schools to demonstrate compliance with § 5–234 of
this title.
(c) The Board shall monitor the expenditures of local school systems to ensure
that minimum school–level funding requirements under § 5–234 of this title are met.
(d) The Board shall monitor the expenditures of funding provided to local school
systems under § 5–223 of this title to ensure that public schools are providing the necessary
services.
(e) (1) The Board shall monitor how additional special education funding
provided under § 5–225 of this title is being used, including:

HOUSE BILL 1421 7
(i) The aggregate number of children in special education services
by school; and
(ii) The special education services that have been provided through
funding under § 5–225 of this title.
(2) If a local school system is not spending funding allocated under § 5–225
of this title in addition to special education spending levels provided by State and local
funds on June 30, 2020, the school system shall provide a written response to the Board
explaining why additional spending on special education is not necessary.
(f) [The] SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE STATE BOARD, THE Board
shall develop an appeals process through which local school systems may request greater
flexibility in meeting this requirement for reasons including a significant shift in total
enrollment or at–promise enrollment between schools from the prior school year to the
current school year.
5–407.
(a) Beginning in fiscal year 2022, ON RECOMMENDATION OF the Board, THE
STATE BOARD may determine to withhold appropriated funds from the Department, the
Maryland Higher Education Commission, the Career and Technical Education Committee,
or any other entity of State or local government responsible for developing an
implementation plan under § 5–404 of this subtitle if the entity:
(1) Has not developed an initial implementation plan, or has not had its
implementation plan approved; or
(2) Has not implemented its implementation plan appropriately.
(b) The STATE Board shall notify the Comptroller, the Governor, the President
of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates regarding the intent to withhold
appropriated funds under this section.
(c) After receiving notification from the STATE Board under subsection (b) of this
section, the Comptroller shall withhold the amount of funding that the STATE Board
determines is necessary to be withheld.
5–408.
(a) [In] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, IN order to meet its
obligation to track whether the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future is progressing according
to plan, the Board shall:
(1) Develop guidelines for the submission of reports by:

HOUSE BILL 1421
(i) The Department;
(ii) Local school systems; and
(iii) Public schools;
(2) Using reports submitted in accordance with item (1) of this subsection,
and the Board’s ongoing monitoring as a guide, gather and analyze disaggregated data, in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section, to measure progress made on the
implementation of the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future by examining:
(i) The effects on student performance over time, with specific
emphasis on closing achievement gaps between student groups of different:
1. Race;
2. Ethnicity;
3. Disability status;
4. Household income;
5. Linguistic status; and
6. Any other student group characteristics that feature
achievement gaps as determined by the Board; and
(ii) Student outcomes, such as:
1. Absenteeism;
2. Disciplinary action;
3. Enrichment opportunities; and
4. Meaningful family involvement;
(3) Monitor and review the performance of each teacher preparation
program at an institution of higher education and alternative teacher preparation program;
(4) Monitor changes in the concentration of students eligible for free and
reduced price meals within public schools and local school systems;
(5) Examine the school–level diversity of public school staff and student
bodies;

HOUSE BILL 1421 9
(6) Monitor and review the placement and concentration of students in
particular racial, ethnic, linguistic, economic, and disability status groups assigned to:
(i) Novice teachers;
(ii) Teachers providing instruction in fields in which they lack
expertise;
(iii) Substitute teachers who teach the same class for more than 1
week; and
(iv) Effective teachers, including teachers at levels three and four of
the career ladder established under Title 6, Subtitle 10 of this article;
(7) Monitor and review the progress of community schools receiving grants
under § 5–223 of this article;
(8) Monitor public schools and local school systems to ensure that sufficient
numbers of teachers are participating in the career ladder and achieving National Board
Certification, as provided in Title 6, Subtitle 10 of this article;
(9) Examine the racial, ethnic, disability–status, and income makeup of
full–day prekindergarten students, disaggregated by providers, and monitor whether the
mix of public and private prekindergarten providers is effectively meeting the needs of
families; and
(10) [Approve] COMMENT ON the plans for deployment of Expert Review
Teams submitted by the Department and the Career and Technical Education Committee
under §§ 5–411 and 5–412 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) In gathering and analyzing data to complete its duties under this
subtitle, the Board may collect data from any relevant entities.
(2) If additional data is needed for the Board to complete its duties, the
Board may request that other appropriate government agencies aid in the collection of data.
(3) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a government agency shall provide
the Board with any requested data.
(4) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a government agency whose aid the
Board has requested under this subsection shall regularly collect the requested data and
provide it to the Board.
(c) The Board shall work with the Maryland Longitudinal Data System Center to
collect and analyze data necessary to carry out the Board’s responsibilities under this
subtitle and may direct the Center to provide:

HOUSE BILL 1421
(1) A researcher designated by the Board access to the data in the
Maryland Longitudinal Data System in accordance with the procedures for staff
authorization and data access established by the Maryland Longitudinal Data System
governing board;
(2) Aggregate data tables; or
(3) Research or evaluation.
(d) Any student–level information reported to or by the Board shall be
disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, family income level, linguistic status, and
disability status.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE STATE BOARD SHALL REVIEW THE REQUESTED OR REQUIRED
REPORTS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND FOR THE BLUEPRINT FOR MARYLAND’S
FUTURE AS A WHOLE TO IDENTIFY DUPLICATION AND OPPORTUNITIES TO CLARIFY
AND CONSOLIDATE REPORTING REQUESTS OR REQUIREMENTS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE STATE BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON
RECOMMENDATIONS DEVELOPED AFTER THE REVIEW CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
5–409.
(a) In addition to any other duties assigned or duties granted to the Board under
this subtitle, the Board, UNLESS OTHERWISE DIRECTED BY THE STATE BOARD, has the
power to perform the duties described in this section.
(b) The Board shall:
(1) Oversee the work of the Career and Technical Education Committee
established under § 21–209 of this article;
(2) Coordinate through the Department the State’s participation in the
Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development’s Program for International
Student Assessment survey program;
(3) In accordance with § 5–408(c) of this subtitle, report on or before
November 1 each year for calendar years 2021 through 2031 to the Governor, the public,
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly,
on:

HOUSE BILL 1421 11
(i) Progress made on the implementation of the Blueprint for
Maryland’s Future;
(ii) Recommended legislative changes, including any changes
necessary to ensure that the implementations have adequate resources and measurements;
(iii) The degree to which State and local agencies, as applicable, are
carrying out their assigned roles in implementing the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future; and
(iv) Whether the funds provided by the State and local governments
are consistent with the Board’s estimate of what is necessary to fully implement the
Blueprint for Maryland’s Future;
(4) Provide training to Expert Review Teams established under § 5–411 of
this subtitle; and
(5) Provide outreach and educational materials to parents, students, and
members of the public on the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future.
(c) [The] UNLESS OTHERWISE DIRECTED BY THE STATE BOARD, THE Board
may:
(1) Recommend that the Department and the Maryland Higher Education
Commission review the accreditation of a program reviewed under § 5–408(a)(3) of this
subtitle that was found to be ineffective;
(2) Determine that the career ladder system under Title 6, Subtitle 10 of
this article has been well established throughout the State for the purposes of
implementing the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future;
(3) Make grants to innovative programs developed by public schools,
institutions of postsecondary education, nonprofit organizations, and other persons that
help further the Board’s purpose; and
(4) Perform any other duties necessary to carry out the powers granted
under this subtitle.
5–410.
(a) In addition to [its own] THE assessments and tracking of progress, required
under § 5–406 of this subtitle, the STATE Board shall contract with a public or private
entity to conduct an independent evaluation of the State’s progress in implementing the
Blueprint for Maryland’s Future and achieving the expected outcomes during the
implementation period.
(b) The independent evaluation shall include an assessment of:

HOUSE BILL 1421
(1) The use of additional funding to meet the goals of the Blueprint for
Maryland’s Future;
(2) Progress toward the goals of the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future and
whether the goals have been achieved; and
(3) Any recommendations to alter the goals or strategies employed to reach
the goals, including new uses for existing funds or additional funding.
(c) (1) An entity with which the STATE Board contracts for an independent
evaluation shall report its results to the Board on or before:
(i) December 1, 2026; and
(ii) October 1, 2030.
(2) The STATE Board shall contract for each independent evaluation as
soon as practicable.
(d) (1) (i) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 30, 2026, THE BOARD SHALL
MAKE A RECOMMENDATION TO THE STATE BOARD ON WHETHER THE BLUEPRINT
FOR MARYLAND’S FUTURE IS BEING IMPLEMENTED AS INTENDED AND ACHIEVING
THE EXPECTED OUTCOMES.
(II) On or before January 15, 2027, the STATE Board shall, using the
first independent evaluation and its own judgment, report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on
whether the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future is being implemented as intended and
achieving the expected outcomes.
[(ii)] (III) The STATE Board’s report shall include an assessment of
the State’s progress towards:
1. Increasing the number of teachers achieving National
Board Certification;
2. Providing full–day prekindergarten programs for 3– and
4–year–olds in accordance with Title 7, Subtitle 1A of this article;
3. Improving behavioral health services in accordance with §
7–447 of this article; and
4. Ensuring that students enrolled in public schools meet
college and career standards in accordance with § 7–205.1 of this article.

HOUSE BILL 1421 13
[(iii)] (IV) The STATE Board’s report shall include any legislative or
structural corrections necessary to fully implement the Blueprint.
(2) On or before December 1, 2030, the STATE Board shall report on the
results of the final independent evaluation to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(3) The STATE Board’s reports under this subsection shall include:
(i) Practices being used to close achievement gaps between students
of different groups listed in § 5–408(a)(2)(i) of this subtitle;
(ii) Progress made in closing the achievement gaps listed under item
(i) of this paragraph; and
(iii) Assessments of student outcomes listed under § 5–408(a)(2)(ii) of
this subtitle, disaggregated by race, income, ethnicity, and gender.
(e) (1) [The] ON RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE BOARD, THE STATE
Board shall determine:
(i) Whether the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future is working as
intended;
(ii) What steps are necessary to continue providing a globally
competitive education to the children of the State;
(iii) If any changes to the structure, functioning, and authority of
State and local agencies responsible for education are necessary; and
(iv) Whether the Board should continue to monitor implementation
of the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future after June 30, 2032.
(2) In making its determination, the STATE Board shall examine the
manner in which State and local government entities responsible for implementing the
Blueprint for Maryland’s Future have contributed to educating, training, providing
learning opportunities for, and developing the careers of students and young people in the
State.
(3) [The] IN CONSULTATION WITH THE BOARD, THE STATE Board shall
identify ways to foster partnerships between local school systems, public schools, and
institutions of higher education, and develop collaborative relationships among the entities
examined under paragraph (2) of this subsection to create a world–class 21st–century
education system in the State.

HOUSE BILL 1421
(4) The STATE Board shall report its findings under this subsection in the
report required under subsection (d)(2) of this section.
5–411.
(a) In this section, “Program” means the Expert Review Team Program.
(b) The Department shall establish, administer, and supervise an Expert Review
Team Program.
(g) (1) Beginning on or before July 1, 2021, and each July 1 through 2030, the
Department shall develop [and submit to the Board for approval] a plan to deploy the
Expert Review Teams in the following school year AND SUBMIT THE PLAN TO THE
BOARD FOR COMMENT.
(2) (i) Beginning on July 1, 2023, the Department shall send Expert
Review Teams to at least 10% of public schools in at least three different local school
systems each year.
(ii) An Expert Review Team shall be sent to every residential facility
in which juveniles are educated in accordance with Title 9, Subtitle 6 of the Human Services
Article by the end of the 2025–2026 school year.
(iii) An Expert Review Team shall be sent at least once to every public
school in the State by the end of the 2030–2031 school year.
(3) (i) The Department shall, in accordance with an approved
deployment plan and subject to the provisions of this subsection, send an Expert Review
Team to:
1. Each school determined to be one of the lowest performing
schools in the State once each year;
2. Schools determined to be lower performing schools in the
State on a regular schedule but not every year;
3. Schools determined to be the highest performing in the
State; and
4. All other schools at intervals determined by a randomized
selection process.
(ii) The lowest and highest performing schools shall be determined
by:
1. A. The overall performance on State assessments; and

HOUSE BILL 1421 15
B. The performance of subgroups of students on State
assessments; or
2. Based on data produced by the data monitoring system
established under the federal Every Student Succeeds Act.
(4) Beginning on July 1, 2025, a school that has not been selected for review
by an Expert Review Team may submit a request to the Department for a review.
(5) The Board may request that the Department send an Expert Review
Team to a particular school.
(6) Beginning in the 2022–2023 school year, the Department shall send an
Expert Review Team to a school or a group of schools in the same immediate area in which
students continue to demonstrate learning loss that began in relation to the COVID–19
pandemic for the purpose of determining the reason that the learning loss continues.
(h) During the period from July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2025, the report and
recommendations of an Expert Review Team shall be advisory only and may be used by a
school and local school system to strengthen the school program and the management of
the school and local school system.
(i) (1) (i) Beginning on July 1, 2025, the report and recommendations of
an Expert Review Team shall be used by the Department as the basis for a
[recommendation to the Board] DETERMINATION under § 5–405 of this subtitle as to
whether to release a portion of the annual increase in funding for the upcoming school year
because the school and the local school system have developed a satisfactory plan for the
use of the funds consistent with the Expert Review Team’s recommendations.
(ii) In fulfilling its duties under this subsection, an Expert Review
Team in the Program may make recommendations on:
1. Requiring State action in accordance with § 7–203.4 of this
article; or
2. Pairing the school with a higher performing school with
similar demographics from which the school leadership collaborates and shares expertise
for the benefit of faculty and staff.
(2) If the STATE Board determines that all or a portion of a school’s annual
increase in funding should not be released due to an unsatisfactory plan, the Department
shall work with the school and local school system to develop a satisfactory plan to allow
release of the withheld funds.
5–412.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1421
(2) “CTE Committee” means the Career and Technical Education
Committee established under § 21–207 of this article.
(3) “Program” means the CTE Expert Review Team Program.
(b) (6) (i) Beginning on July 1, 2022, and ending July 1, 2031, the CTE
Committee shall develop and submit to the STATE Board, for approval, a plan to deploy
the CTE Expert Review Teams in the following school year.
(ii) Subject to the STATE Board’s approval, the CTE Committee
shall schedule CTE Expert Review Team school visits in a manner designed to provide the
CTE Committee and the Department with sufficient information to make informed
decisions on the release of school funds conditioned on student performance, including
adequate time for a school to respond to an Expert Review Team’s report and
recommendations before decisions are made regarding the retaining of school funds.
5–414.
(a) On or after July 1, 2026, the Board, in consultation with the Maryland
Longitudinal Data System Center, shall perform an evaluation that measures the
effectiveness of efforts to increase diversity in:
(1) Enrollment in teacher preparation programs;
(2) Teacher candidates who successfully graduate from teacher
preparation programs and subsequently enter the teaching profession; and
(3) Teachers and school leaders in primary and secondary schools in the
State.
(b) The evaluation required under subsection (a) of this section shall be conducted
in consultation with at least one institution of higher education in the State.
(c) (1) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 30, 2026, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT
A REPORT TO THE STATE BOARD ON THE RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION
PERFORMED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING ANY
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ALTERATIONS TO STATE PROGRAMS AND POLICIES AS
NEEDED TO ENSURE DIVERSITY IN THE AREAS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) On or before December 31, 2026, the STATE Board shall submit a report
to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on the results of the evaluation performed under subsection (a) of this
section, including any recommendations for alterations in State programs and policies as
needed to ensure diversity in the areas described under subsection (a) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1421 17
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.